Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1301.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the PrEP and PEP for Pennsylvania Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health care provider." A licensed hospital or health care facility or a person licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth, including a physician, psychologist, emergency medical services worker, advanced practice registered nurse or 123456789101112131415161718 physician's assistant."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) An individual or group health insurance policy, contract or plan that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care provider on an expense-incurred service or prepaid basis that is offered by or is governed under any of the following:(i) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 of that act.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term does not include accident only, fixed indemnity, hospital indemnity, limited benefit, credit, dental, vision, specified disease, Medicare supplement, long-term care, disability income, workers' compensation, automobile medical payment insurance or a policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents."HIV." The human immunodeficiency virus."PEP." A post-exposure prophylaxis HIV medication that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and that can be taken as a prophylaxis to prevent the transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus after a person is exposed."PrEP." A pre-exposure prophylaxis HIV medication that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and 20250HB1301PN1495 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that can be taken as a prophylaxis to prevent the transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus before a person is exposed."Prescriber." A person licensed, registered or otherwise lawfully authorized to distribute, dispense or administer medication.Section 3. Mandated coverage.(a) Requirements.--(1) A health insurance policy that is offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this subsection shall provide coverage for all the expenses associated with PEP and PrEP, including the costs of associated laboratory tests, patient visits to a health care provider for the purpose of HIV medication counseling and patient visits to a prescriber to have PEP and PrEP prescribed or maintained.(2) A patient shall not incur any copay, coinsurance, deductible or other costsharing for any of the expenses associated with PEP and PrEP, including the costs of associated laboratory tests, patient visits to a health care provider for the purpose of HIV medication counseling and patient visits to a prescriber to have PEP or PrEP prescribed or maintained.(b) Specialty tier.--A provider of a health insurance policy may not move a PEP or PrEP, or an associated laboratory service for monitoring, visit to a health care provider or visit to a prescriber, into a specialty tier solely for monetary gain.(c) Counseling.--Unless medically necessary, a health insurance policy shall not require counseling by an infectious disease specialist or immunologist as a condition to receive PEP or PrEP, or an associated laboratory service for monitoring, 20250HB1301PN1495 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 visit to a health care provider or visit to a prescriber.Section 4. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1301PN1495 - 4 - 123456789101112131415